District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.226

Limitation on duplicative projects.

(a)

The grant-managing entity shall take steps to avoid awarding subgrants to a nonprofit that has been awarded or is being awarded funds from the DC Children and Youth Investment Trust Corporation (“Trust”) for the same or similar program purposes for which it is applying for funding from the Fund.

(b)

Within 30 days after the effective date of the MOU, the grant-managing entity shall provide to the Mayor, or his or her designee, and the Council, a plan that sets forth procedures for avoiding the award of duplicative funds from the Trust and the Fund.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1017, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.